Oklahoma, session 2026, SB525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-121, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-121. A. It shall be the mandatory duty of the county


commissioners of each county to furnish, at county expense, in each


county seat a suitable office for the county election board. The


office shall provide adequate space for storage of election records


and supplies, voting devices, ballot boxes, and adequate space for


the exercise of other functions required by law of the county


election board and shall be equipped with suitable furniture, and


office equipment, and a telephone. The office shall be convenient


to the public, shall have furniture, furnishings and fixtures, and



Req. No. 1117 Page 1


other equipment comparable to other county offices within the


county, and necessary to the operation of the office.


B. 1. The county commissioners of each county shall, at county


expense, implement security measures at the county election board


that are equivalent to security measures the county provides to its


other county agencies, in order to ensure the county election board


office is adequately protected from physical intrusions or attacks


and to provide cybersecurity for county-owned computer systems


operated by the county election board.


2. County officials shall immediately notify the Secretary of


the State Election Board upon learning of an attempted or successful


physical or cyber attack or intrusion committed against the county


election board.


C. To ensure the security of election records, equipment,


computers, software, ballots, supplies, and other materials


necessary to conduct elections:


1. The county election board shall not share storage space


where ballots, voter registration records, or election equipment are


stored with any other county agency unless authorized by the


Secretary of the State Election Board; and


2. No county personnel other than those employed by the county


election board shall be assigned workspace within the physical


offices that are assigned to the county election board; and



Req. No. 1117 Page 2


3. The county election board shall provide sufficient training,


approved by the Secretary of the State Election Board, to the county


sheriff and law enforcement officers of the county in order to


secure the election process pursuant to state law as well as secure


ballots pursuant to subsection C of Section 14-115.4 of this title.


Provided, nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the county


election board office from being located within the county


courthouse or another county-owned building shared by multiple


county agencies, nor shall it restrict the county election board


from utilizing common areas intended for use by multiple county


agencies other than as specifically prohibited in this subsection.


D. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall have the


authority to enforce the requirements of, and may promulgate


administrative rules to implement the provisions of, this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1117 CN 1/19/2025 5:38:02 AM















Req. No. 1117 Page 3